Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.270

Procedure when judgment is for defendant.

If the defendant recovers judgment against the plaintiff, all the proceeds of sales and money collected by the sheriff and deposited with the clerk and all the property attached and retained by the sheriff shall be delivered to the defendant or the defendant's agent. The order of attachment shall be discharged and the property released therefrom.

[ 1987 c 442 s 827; 1886 p 45 s 28; RRS s 670. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.240.]